Utah statutes.
73-2-5.   Aid to district court.
In aid of the district court the state engineer shall have power to collect
facts and make surveys and do all other necessary things, the cost of which
shall be paid by the state upon presentation to the director of the Division
of Finance of monthly statements and certification by the state engineer.
